Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-216
Water divisions; division supervisors; duties.

The division supervisor or supervisors shall, under the direction of the Chief Water Officer, see that the laws relative to the distribution of water are executed in accordance with the rights of priority of appropriation.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 4, p. 835;

C.S.1922, § 8423;

C.S.1929, § 81-6304;

R.S.1943, § 46-219;

Laws 1953, c. 157, § 2, p. 495;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-219;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 339.

Under former law, Department of Roads and Irrigation was authorized to shut and lock headgates of junior appropriators when there was not sufficient water to supply the needs of senior appropriators. Platte Valley Irr. Dist. v. Tilley, 142 Neb. 122, 5 N.W.2d 252 (1942).

Right to shut and lock headgates is not exclusive remedy. Farmers & Merchants' Irr. Co. v. Cozad Irr. Co., 65 Neb. 3, 90 N.W. 951 (1902).